Utah statutes.
16-4-307.   Purchase by corporation, officer, or director -- Redemption.
(1) (a)  If at the sale of shares, no bidder offers the amount of the
delinquent assessment and all other amounts payable, the shares may be bid on
and purchased by the corporation through the secretary, president, or any
director for the amount of the delinquent assessment and all other amounts
payable.
(b)  If a corporation purchases shares under Subsection (1), the delinquent
assessment and all other amounts payable shall be credited as paid in full on
the books of the corporation.
(2)  If purchased under Subsection (1), entry of the transfer of the shares to
the corporation shall be made on the corporation's books.
(3)  Any shares acquired by a corporation under this section, or purchased by
an officer or director for the officer's or director's own benefit, are
subject to redemption by the shareholder for a period of 30 days following the
day on which the shares are sold at auction.
(4) (a)  Shares subject to redemption under Subsection (3) may be redeemed at
a price equal to the amount of the delinquent assessment and all other amounts
payable on the day of the sale, plus interest through the day on which the
shares are redeemed.
(b)  The amount of interest under Subsection (4)(a) is the amount determined
under Section 15-1-4.
